test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-varrim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - varrim: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    varrim+N+Sg+Nom: varrim
    varrim+N+Sg+Gen: varrim
    varrim+N+Sg+Acc: varrim
    varrim+N+Sg+Ill: varriimân
    varrim+N+Sg+Loc: varriimist
    varrim+N+Sg+Com: varriimáin
    varrim+N+Sg+Abe: varrimttáá
    varrim+N+Ess: varriimin
    varrim+N+Par: varriimid
    varrim+N+Pl+Nom: varriimeh
    varrim+N+Pl+Gen: varriimij
    varrim+N+Pl+Acc: varriimijd
    varrim+N+Pl+Ill: varriimáid
    varrim+N+Pl+Loc: varriimijn
    varrim+N+Pl+Com: varriimijguin
    varrim+N+Pl+Abe: varriimijttáá
    
